Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.140

Chapter not applicable to interest, penalties, or costs on delinquent property taxes.

This chapter does not apply in respect to interest, penalties, or costs imposed on delinquent property taxes under chapter 84.64 RCW.

[ 1981 c 322 s 8.]